Washington statutes.
RCW 15.51.050

Rules.

The director may adopt rules necessary to carry out the purpose and provisions of this chapter concerning, but not limited to:

(1) Brassica seed production districts;

(2) Notification of a designated central clearinghouse for growers to report their intention to plant a Brassica seed crop within a Brassica seed production district;

(3) Isolation distances between Brassica seed crops within a Brassica seed production district;

(4) Exclusion of designated Brassica seed crops within a Brassica seed production district, except under terms of a Brassica production agreement;

(5) Control of volunteer and weed Brassica plants within a Brassica seed production district; and

(6) Brassica production agreements.

[ 2007 c 181 s 5.]